Illinois, session 104th, SB2790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Act is amended 5by adding Section 8.6 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2305/8.6 new)7    Sec. 8.6. Tobacco quitline.8    (a) In this Section, "tobacco quitline" means a resource 9that is free to Illinois residents who use tobacco products, 10electronic cigarettes, or other nicotine products and want to 11quit using those products, that is accessible by a toll-free 12telephone number, and that is established, operated, and 13funded with the assistance of the Department of Public Health. 14"Tobacco quitline" includes an evidence-based program, 15certified quitline counselors, and staff to provide the 16support needed for Illinois residents who want to end their 17dependence on tobacco and nicotine products.18    (b) The Department of Public Health shall establish, 19maintain, and promote a statewide tobacco quitline for 20Illinois residents.21    (c) The Department of Public Health may contract with 22third-party entities to operate the tobacco quitline and 23provide cessation services.  SB2790 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17099 BDA 30518 b1    (d) The Department of Public Health shall adopt rules to 2implement and administer this Section.  3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.